en: Microphone Preamps
xx: Microphone Preamps
cs: Mikrofonní předzesilovače
da: Mikrofonforforstærker
de: Mikrofonvorverstärker
es: Preamplificadores de micrófono
fr: Préamplis de microphone
it: Preamplificatori microfonici
ja: マイクプリアンプ
nl: Microfoonvoorversterkers
no: Mikrofon-forforsterkere
pl: Przedwzmacniacze mikrofonowe
pt: Pré-amplificador de microfone
ru: Предварительные усилители для микрофонов
sv: Mikrofonförförstärkare
tr: Mikrofon Preamplifikatörleri

en: Noise Gates & Compressors
xx: Noise Gates & Compressors
cs: Šumové brány a kompresory
da: Støjreduktion og komprimering
de: Noise Gates & Kompressoren
es: Compresores y puertas de ruido
fr: Noise Gates et compresseurs
it: Noise gate e compressori
ja: ノイズゲート・コンプレッサー
nl: Geluidspoorten en -compressors
no: Noisegates og kompressorer
pl: Bramki szumów i kompresory
pt: Compressores e barreiras contra ruídos
ru: Пороговые шумоподавители и компрессоры
sv: Brusgrindar och kompressorer
tr: Gürültü Geçit ve Sıkıştırıcıları

en: Phono Preamps
xx: Phono Preamps
cs: Gramofonní předzesilovače
da: Forforstærker
de: Phono-Vorverstärker
es: Preamplificadores de sonido
fr: Préamplis phono
it: Preamplificatori phono
ja: フォノプリアンプ
nl: Phono voorversterkers
no: Forforsterkere
pl: Przedwzmacniacze gramofonowe
pt: Pré-amplificador de áudio
ru: Фонокорректоры
sv: Förförstärkare
tr: Ses Kayıt Preamplifikatörleri

en: Speakers
xx: Speakers
cs: Reproduktory
da: Højttalere
de: Lautsprecher
es: Altavoces
fr: Enceintes et haut-parleurs, Haut-parleurs, Baffles, Enceinte
it: Altoparlanti
ja: スピーカー
nl: Luidsprekers
no: Høyttalere
pl: Głośniki
pt: Alto-falantes
ru: Акустические колонки
sv: Högtalare
tr: Hoparlörler

en: Studio Recording Bundles
xx: Studio Recording Bundles
cs: Sestavy studiového vybavení
da: Sæt til lydoptagelse
de: Studio-Aufnahmesets
es: Equipos de grabación en estudio
fr: Ensembles d'articles pour enregistrements studio
it: Kit per studio di registrazione
ja: スタジオレコーディングバンドル
nl: Studio-opnamesets
no: Studioopptakspakker
pl: Zestawy do studiów nagraniowych
pt: Pacotes de acessórios para gravação em estúdio
ru: Комплекты для студийной записи
sv: Studioinspelningssatser
tr: Stüdyo Kaydı Setleri

en: Audio Players & Recorders
xx: Audio Players & Recorders
cs: Přehrávače a záznamníky zvuku
da: Lydafspillere og -optagere
de: Audioplayer & -rekorder
es: Reproducción y grabación de sonido
fr: Lecteurs et enregistreurs audio
it: Lettori e registratori audio
ja: 録音・再生機器
nl: Audiospelers en -recorders
no: Lydspillere og -opptakere
pl: Odtwarzacze i nagrywarki audio
pt: Players e gravadores de áudio
ru: Устройства для воспроизведения и записи звука
sv: Ljuduppspelare och inspelningsutrustning
tr: Ses Çalar ve Kaydediciler

en: Boomboxes
xx: Boomboxes
cs: Radiomagnetofony
da: Ghettoblastere
de: Ghettoblaster
es: Equipos estéreo portátiles
fr: Radiocassettes
it: Boombox
ja: ラジカセ
nl: Boomboxen
no: Boombokser
pl: Boomboksy
pt: Boomboxes
ru: Бумбоксы
sv: Bergsprängare
tr: Taşınabilir Kaset Çalarlar

en: CD Players & Recorders
xx: CD Players & Recorders
cs: CD přehrávače
da: Cd-afspillere og -optagere
de: CD-Player & -Rekorder
es: Reproductores y grabadoras de CD
fr: Lecteurs-enregistreurs CD
it: Lettori CD
ja: CDプレーヤー
nl: Cd-spelers
no: CD-spillere og -opptakere
pl: Odtwarzacze i nagrywarki CD
pt: Reprodutores e gravadores de CD
ru: CD-плееры
sv: CD-spelare och CD-brännare
tr: CD Çalarlar ve Kaydediciler

en: Cassette Players & Recorders
xx: Cassette Players & Recorders
cs: Kazetové přehrávače a rekordéry
da: Kassetteafspillere og -optagere
de: Kassettenspieler & -Rekorder
es: Reproductores y grabadoras de casetes
fr: Magnétophones à cassettes
it: Registratori/lettori di musicassette
ja: カセットデッキ
nl: Cassettespelers
no: Kassettspillere og -opptakere
pl: Odtwarzacze i nagrywarki kaset
pt: Toca-fitas
ru: Кассетные проигрыватели
sv: Kassettspelare och bandspelare
tr: Kaset Çalarlar ve Kaydediciler

en: Home Theater Systems
xx: Home Theater Systems
cs: Systémy domácího kina
da: Hjemmebiografsystemer
de: Heimkinosysteme
es: Sistemas de cine en casa
fr: Systèmes home cinéma
it: Sistemi Home Theater
ja: ホームシアター
nl: Thuisbioscoopsystemen
no: Hjemmekinoanlegg
pl: Systemy kina domowego
pt: Sistemas de home theater
ru: Системы домашних кинотеатров
sv: Hemmabiosystem
tr: Ev Sinema Sistemleri

en: Jukeboxes
xx: Jukeboxes
cs: Jukeboxy
da: Jukebokse
de: Jukeboxen
es: Gramolas
fr: Jukebox
it: Jukebox
ja: ジュークボックス
nl: Jukeboxen
no: Jukebokser
pl: Szafy grające
pt: Juke-boxes
ru: Музыкальные автоматы
sv: Jukeboxar
tr: Paralı Müzik Kutuları

en: Karaoke Systems
xx: Karaoke Systems
cs: Karaoke systémy
da: Karaokesystemer
de: Karaokesysteme
es: Sistemas de karaokes
fr: Ensembles karaoké
it: Impianti karaoke
ja: カラオケ機器
nl: Karaokesystemen
no: Karaokesystemer
pl: Systemy karaoke
pt: Sistemas de karaokê
ru: Системы караоке
sv: Karaokesystem
tr: Karaoke Sistemleri

en: MP3 Players
xx: MP3 Players
cs: MP3 přehrávače
da: MP3-afspillere
de: MP3-Player
es: Reproductores MP3
fr: Lecteurs MP3, MP3, Baladeurs MP3
it: Lettori MP3
ja: MP3プレーヤー
nl: Mp3-spelers
no: MP3-spillere
pl: Odtwarzacze MP3
pt: MP3 players
ru: MP3-Плееры
sv: MP3-spelare
tr: MP3 Çalarlar

en: MiniDisc Players & Recorders
xx: MiniDisc Players & Recorders
cs: Minidiskové přehrávače a rekordéry
da: MiniDisc-afspillere og -optagere
de: MiniDisc-Player
es: Reproductores y grabadoras de MiniDisc
fr: Lecteurs-enregistreurs MiniDisc
it: Lettori MiniDisc
ja: MDデッキ
nl: Minidiskspelers
no: MiniDisc-spillere og -opptakere
pl: Odtwarzacze i nagrywarki MiniDisc
pt: Gravadores e MiniDisc players
ru: Проигрыватели минидисков
sv: MiniDisc-spelare
tr: Mini Disk Çalarlar ve Kaydediciler

en: Multitrack Recorders
xx: Multitrack Recorders
cs: Vícestopé rekordéry
da: Flersporsoptagere
de: Mehrspurrekorder
es: Grabadoras de varias pistas
fr: Enregistreurs multipistes
it: Registratori multitraccia
ja: マルチトラックレコーダー
nl: Meersporenrecorder
no: Flerspor-opptakere
pl: Nagrywarki wielośladowe
pt: Gravadores multifuncionais
ru: Многодорожечные рекордеры
sv: Flerspårsinspelare
tr: Çoklu Parça Kaydediciler

en: Radios
xx: Radios
cs: Radiopřijímače
da: Radioer
de: Radios
es: Radios
fr: Radios, Radio
it: Radio
ja: ラジオ
nl: Radio's
no: Radioer
pl: Radia
pt: Rádios
ru: Радиоприемники
sv: Radioapparater
tr: Radyolar

en: Reel-to-Reel Tape Players & Recorders
xx: Reel-to-Reel Tape Players & Recorders
cs: Cívkové magnetofony
da: Spolebåndoptagere og -afspillere
de: Tonbandgeräte
es: Reproductores y grabadoras de bobina abierta
fr: Magnétophones à bobines
it: Riproduttori e registratori con nastro a bobina
ja: オープンリールデッキ
nl: Bandrecorders
no: Båndspillere og -opptakere
pl: Odtwarzacze i magnetofony szpulowe
pt: Tape decks de rolo
ru: Катушечные магнитофоны и плееры
sv: Rullbandspelare och bandspelare
tr: İki Makaralı Kaset Çalarlar ve Kaydediciler

en: Stereo Systems
xx: Stereo Systems
cs: Stereopřehrávače
da: Stereosystemer
de: Stereoanlagen
es: Sistemas estéreo
fr: Systèmes stéréo, Chaîne hi-fi, Chaînes hi-fi
it: Sistemi stereo
ja: ステレオセット
nl: Stereosystemen
no: Stereoanlegg
pl: Systemy stereo
pt: Aparelhos de som
ru: Стереосистемы
sv: Stereosystem
tr: Stereo Sistemler

en: Turntables & Record Players
xx: Turntables & Record Players
cs: Gramofony
da: Pladespillere
de: Plattenspieler
es: Gramófonos y tocadiscos
fr: Tourne-disques
it: Giradischi
ja: ターンテーブル・レコードプレーヤー
nl: Draaitafels en platenspelers
no: Platespillere
pl: Gramofony i adaptery
pt: Toca-discos
ru: Проигрыватели грампластинок
sv: Grammofonspelare och skivspelare
tr: Pikaplar ve Plak Çalarlar

en: Voice Recorders
xx: Voice Recorders
cs: Hlasové záznamníky
da: Stemmeoptagere
de: Diktiergeräte
es: Grabadoras de voz
fr: Dictaphones
it: Registratori vocali
ja: ボイスレコーダー
nl: Spraakrecorders
no: Taleopptakere
pl: Dyktafony
pt: Gravadores de voz
ru: Диктофоны
sv: Diktafoner
tr: Ses Kayıt Cihazları